Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 3 Unemployment Compensation

Revision of chapter. —

Section 1, ch. 114, Laws 1983, revised this chapter, amending and renumbering §§

27-3-101

through

27-3-205

as §§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1983 act has been attempted; but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this chapter, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed where it was felt they would be helpful.

See the tables of revised and renumbered sections in Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

For section providing that these provisions may be cited as the “Wyoming Employment Security Law,” see §

27-3-101

. For definition of “this act,” see § 27-3-102(a)(xxii).

Section 2, ch. 114, Laws 1983, relating to public policy, reads:

“(a)

As a guide to the interpretation and application of the Wyoming Employment Security Law, the public policy of this state is as follows:

Economic insecurity due to unemployment is a serious menace to the health, morals and welfare of the people of this state;

Involuntary unemployment is a subject of general interest and concern which requires appropriate legislation to prevent its spread and lighten the burden which so often falls with force upon the unemployed worker and his family. The achievement of social security requires protection against this great hazard of our economic life. This can be provided by operating free public employment offices in affiliation with a nationwide system of employment services, by encouraging employers to provide more stable employment and by the systematic accumulation of funds during periods of employment to provide benefits for periods of unemployment. In this way, the purchasing power can be maintained and the serious social consequences of poor relief assistance can be limited;

The legislature declares that in its considered judgment the public good and the general welfare of the citizens of the state require the enactment of this measure under the police power of the state for the compulsory setting aside of unemployment reserves for the use and benefit of unemployed persons.”

Section 3, ch. 114, Laws 1983, relating to cooperation with other states and the federal government, reads:

“(a)

The legislature declares its intention to provide for:

Cooperation with the appropriate agencies of other states and of the federal government in carrying out the Wyoming Employment Security Law as part of a nationwide employment security program; and

The means to meet requirements of 42 USCS §§ 501 through 503, 26 USCS § 3301 et seq., 29 USCS § 49 et seq., and 42 USCS § 601 et seq. in order to secure for this state and its citizens available grants and privileges.”

Section 4, ch. 114, Laws 1983, relating to construction, reads: “The Wyoming Employment Security Law shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purpose to promote employment security by increasing opportunities for placement through the maintenance of a system of public employment offices and to provide for the payment of compensation to individuals with respect to their unemployment through the accumulation of reserves.”

Application form. —

The preprinted form used for submitting an application for benefits under The Wyoming Employment Security Law, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

27-3-101

to

27-3-706

, is worded in terms that are simple, direct, and easily understood. Judge v. Dep't of Empl., 2002 WY 109, 50 P.3d 686,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2002).